seg/mar.2.dix
    <pardef n="मिळ__vblex">
      <!-- infinitives -->
      <e>     <p><l>णे</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      
      <!-- gerunds -->
      <!-- same as infinitive in the nominative -->
      <e>     <p><l>ण</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="__inf_endings"/></e>
      
      <!-- -->
      <e>         <p><l>ायला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="sup"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>         <p><l>ून</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="trans"/><s n="perf"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>         <p><l>ताना</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="trans"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e r="LR">   <p><l>तांना</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="trans"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>  
      <e>     <p><l>त</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>         <p><l>ता</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>         <p><l>ू</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="incp"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      
      <!-- adjectival forms -->
      <e>         <p><l>ालेल</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="perf"/></r></p><par n="__big_suff"/></e>

      <!-- r problems -->
      <e>         <p><l>णा</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="__gpr_gen"/></e>


      <!-- imperatives (CHECK p3) -->
      <e>     <p><l>ू</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ू</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <e>     <p><l></l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ा</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <e>     <p><l>ो</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ोत</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <!-- hortative -->
      <e>     <p><l>ुया</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="incl"/><s n="hort"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e r="LR">  <p><l>ुयात</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="incl"/><s n="hort"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <!-- बस-तो -->
      <e>     <p><l></l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="__vblex_impfv"/></e>
      <!-- बस-लो -->
      <e>     <p><l>ा</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="__vblex_perf"/></e>
      <!-- बस-ीन -->
      <e>     <p><l></l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="__vblex_fut"/></e>
      <!-- बस-लेलो -->
      <e>     <p><l>ा</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="__vblex_plup"/></e>
      <!-- बस-ायचो -->
      <e>     <p><l></l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="__vblex_pred"/></e>
      <!-- बस-ावा -->
      <e>     <p><l></l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="__vblex_subj"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/जा__vblex">
      <!-- infinitives -->
      <e>     <p><l>जाणे</l><r>जाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      
      <!-- gerunds -->
      <!-- same as infinitive in the nominative -->
      <e>     <p><l>जाण</l><r>जाणे<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="__inf_endings"/></e>
      
      <!-- -->
      <e>         <p><l>जायला</l><r>जाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="sup"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>         <p><l>जाऊन</l><r>जाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="trans"/><s n="perf"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>         <p><l>जाताना</l><r>जाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="trans"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e r="LR">   <p><l>जातांना</l><r>जाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="trans"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>  
      <e>     <p><l>जात</l><r>जाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>         <p><l>जाता</l><r>जाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>         <p><l>जाऊ</l><r>जाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="incp"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      
      <!-- adjectival forms -->
      <e>         <p><l>गलेल</l><r>जाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="perf"/></r></p><par n="__big_suff"/></e>

      <!-- r problems -->
      <e>         <p><l>जाणा</l><r>जाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="__gpr_gen"/></e>


      <!-- imperatives (CHECK p3) -->
      <e>     <p><l>जाऊ</l><r>जाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>जाऊ</l><r>जाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <e>     <p><l>जा</l><r>जाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>जा</l><r>जाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e r="LR">  <p><l>जावा</l><r>जाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <e>     <p><l>जाओ</l><r>जाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>जाओत</l><r>जाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <!-- hortative -->
      <e>     <p><l>जाउया</l><r>जाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="incl"/><s n="hort"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e r="LR">  <p><l>जाउयात</l><r>जाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="incl"/><s n="hort"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <!-- बस-तो -->
      <e>     <p><l>जा</l><r>जाणे<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="__vblex_impfv"/></e>
      <!-- बस-लो -->
      <e>     <p><l>गे</l><r>जाणे<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="__vblex_perf"/></e>
      <!-- बस-ीन fallback -->
      <e>     <p><l>जाईन</l><r>जाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>जाऊ</l><r>जाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>जाशील</l><r>जाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>जाल</l><r>जाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>जाईल</l><r>जाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>जातील</l><r>जाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <e>         <p><l>जाणार</l><r>जाणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="pros"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <!-- बस-लेलो -->
      <e>     <p><l>गे</l><r>जाणे<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="__vblex_plup"/></e>
      <!-- बस-ायचो -->
      <e>     <p><l>ज</l><r>जाणे<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="__vblex_pred"/></e>
      <!-- बस-ावा -->
      <e>     <p><l>ज</l><r>जाणे<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="__vblex_subj"/></e>

    </pardef>

    <e lm="जा">              <i></i><par n="/जा__vblex" /></e>
    <e lm="मिळ">                      <i>मिळ</i><par n="मिळ__vblex" /></e>
